District of Columbia statutes.
31-4412

Liability of stockholders; rights of fiduciary stockholders and persons pledging stock.

(a)

All the stockholders of every company incorporated under this chapter shall be severally and individually liable to the policyholders and creditors of the company in which they are stockholders for the unpaid amount due upon the shares of capital stock held by them, respectively, for all debts and contracts made by such company until the whole amount of capital stock fixed and limited by such company shall have been paid in.

(b)

No person holding capital stock in such company as executor, administrator, guardian, committee, or trustee shall be personally subject to any liability as stockholder of such company, but the estate and funds in the hands of such executor, administrator, guardian, committee, or trustee shall be liable in like manner and to the same extent as the testator or intestate or the ward or person interested in such trust would have been if he had been living and competent to act and hold the stock in his own name.

(c)

Every such executor, administrator, guardian, committee, or trustee shall represent the capital stock in his hands at all meetings of the company, and may vote accordingly as a stockholder.

(d)

No person holding capital stock in such company as collateral security shall be personally subject to any liability as stockholder of such company, but the person pledging such capital stock shall be considered as holding the same, and shall be liable as a stockholder accordingly; and every person who shall pledge his capital stock as collateral security may, nevertheless, represent the same at all meetings and vote as a stockholder.

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1146, ch. 672, ch. III, § 12
1981 Ed., § 35-612.
1973 Ed., § 35-512.